California, session 20252026, AB2387.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51522 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:51522. For the purposes of this chapter:(a) “Community development financial institution” means any community development financial institution certified by the federal Community Development Financial Institutions Fund under Part 1805 (commencing with Section 1805.100) of Chapter XVIII of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(b) “First-generation homebuyer” means a first-time homebuyer whose parents neither have, nor have had, an ownership in a principal residence.(a)(c) “First-time homebuyer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50068.5.(b)(d) “Fund” means the California Dream for All Fund.(c)(e) “Government-sponsored enterprise pilot program” means any temporary program, initiative, or guideline established by the Federal National Mortgage Association (Fannie Mae) or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (Freddie Mac), in accordance with their duty-to-serve obligations or other regulatory mandates, that is designed to increase homeownership access for first-generation homebuyers through features such as reduced down payments, alternative underwriting criteria, or partner assistance programs.(f) “Program” means the California Dream for All Program.(d)(g) “Shared appreciation loan” means a deferred-payment subordinate mortgage loan, the repayment of which is based on the amount of the subordinate loan plus the appreciation in the value of the home financed by the loan from the time of purchase to the time the home is sold or refinanced.(h) “Small-plex” means a residential property containing two to four, inclusive, dwelling units.SEC. 2. Section 51524 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:51524. (a) (1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the California Dream for All Fund.(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the agency, without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure pursuant to this chapter and defraying administrative costs of the agency.(3) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, any interest earned or other increment derived from investments made from moneys in the fund shall be deposited in the fund.(b) Moneys deposited in the fund may include appropriations from the Legislature from the General Fund or other state fund, proceeds from the agency issuing revenue bonds for the purposes set forth in this chapter pursuant to Section 51350, the sale or issuance of any debt instrument secured by repayment of loans originated pursuant to this chapter, and repayments from the program.(c) (1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Credit-Enhancement and Guarantee Fund for the purpose of distributing the assistance in Section 51529.5 to first-generation homebuyers with federal individual taxpayer identification numbers or thin credit files and mortgages originated by mission lenders or community development financial institutions. Upon appropriation, the agency shall align the distribution of this assistance with relevant government-sponsored enterprise pilot programs focused on expanding access to credit for first-generation borrowers.SEC. 3. Section 51529.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:51529.5. (a) The agency shall expand the program to additionally serve first-generation homebuyers by providing either of the following:(1) Grants in the form of forgivable deferred loans to first-generation homebuyers whose income does not exceed 80 percent of the area median income.(2) Shared-appreciation loans to first-generation homebuyers whose income exceeds 80 percent of the area median income.(b) The agency shall prioritize assistance described in subdivision (a) for first-generation homebuyers purchasing homes constructed using state-funded infill and starter home production programs.(c) The agency shall expedite approval for assistance described in subdivision (a) for a first-generation homebuyer purchasing a home located in a moderate-density area.(d) The working group established pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 51530) shall explore opportunities for first-generation homebuyers to use assistance from subdivision (a) as down payment assistance for small-plex or accessory dwelling unit ready properties.